Massachusetts, session 194th, S1069.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3(a) of Chapter 209C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the third sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentences:-
"No court shall make an order providing visitation rights to a parent who was convicted
of a crime under Sections 13B, 13B1/2, 13B ¾, 13 F, 13H, 22, 22A, 22B, 22C, 23A, 23B of
chapter 265 or sections 2, 3 of chapter 272, against whom a charge under such statutes has been
continued without a finding, or who after a hearing is found by clear and convincing evidence to
have committed a crime as defined in said chapters, and is seeking to obtain visitation with a
child who was conceived during the commission of that rape. For purposes of this section, the
failure to seek or obtain a conviction of the above-enumerated crimes shall not in and of itself
of 6

constitute proof that such a crime did not occur. Provided, however, such visitation rights may be
granted if and only if such visitation is found to be in the best interests of the child and the
mother of the child affirmatively consents to such visitation action. Termination of these rights
shall not prevent a court from ordering the perpetrator of the crime to pay child support nor shall
it limit the right of the child to inherit through or from the perpetrator of the crime.
Further, no court shall make an order providing visitation rights to a parent who was
convicted of a crime under Sections 13 A and 15D, against whom a charge under such statutes
has been continued without a finding, or who after a hearing is found by clear and convincing
evidence to have committed a crime as defined in said chapters, and is seeking to obtain
visitation with a child where the victim of the crime was pregnant at the time of the crime or
becomes pregnant as a result of the crime: or where the victim and the defendant have a child in
common: or where a child is the victim or witness to the crime. For purposes of this section, the
failure to seek or obtain a conviction of the above-enumerated crimes shall not in and of itself
constitute proof that such a crime did not occur. Provided, however, such visitation rights may be
granted if and only if such visitation is found to be in the best interests of the child and the
mother of the child affirmatively consents to such visitation. Termination of these rights shall not
prevent a court from ordering the perpetrator of the crime to pay child support nor shall it limit
the right of the child to inherit through or from the perpetrator of the crime."
SECTION 2. Section 10 of Chapter 209C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting at the end of the current statute the following section:-
"(f) No court shall make an order providing custody rights to a parent who was convicted
of a crime under Sections 13B, 13B1/2, 13B ¾, 13 F, 13H, 22, 22A, 22B, 22C, 23A, 23B of
of 6

chapter 265 or sections 2, 3 of chapter 272, against whom a charge under such statutes has been
continued without a finding, or who after a hearing is found by clear and convincing evidence to
have committed a crime as defined in said chapters, and is seeking to obtain any form of custody
of a child who was conceived during the commission of that rape. For purposes of this section,
the failure to seek or obtain a conviction of the above-enumerated crimes shall not in and of itself
constitute proof that such a crime did not occur. Provided, however, such custody rights may be
granted if and only if such custody is found to be in the best interests of the child and the mother
of the child affirmatively consents to such custody. Termination of these rights shall not prevent
a court from ordering the perpetrator of the crime to pay child support nor shall it limit the right
of the child to inherit through or from the perpetrator of the rape.
Further, no court shall make an order providing custody rights to a parent who was
convicted of a crime under Sections 13 A and 15D, against whom a charge under such statutes
has been continued without a finding, or who after a hearing is found by clear and convincing
evidence to have committed a crime as defined in said chapters, and is seeking to obtain
visitation with a child where the victim of the crime was pregnant at the time of the crime or
becomes pregnant as a result of the crime: or where the victim and the defendant have a child in
common: or where a child is the victim or witness to the crime. For purposes of this section, the
failure to seek or obtain a conviction of the above-enumerated crimes shall not in and of itself
constitute proof that such a crime did not occur. Provided, however, such visitation or custody
rights may be granted if and only if such custody is found to be in the best interests of the child
and the mother of the child affirmatively consents to such visitation or custody action.
Termination of these rights shall not prevent a court from ordering the perpetrator of the crime to
of 6

pay child support nor shall it limit the right of the child to inherit through or from the perpetrator
of the crime."
SECTION 3. Chapter 208, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by inserting the following section:-
"Section 31B. No court shall make an order providing custody or visitation rights to a
parent who was convicted of a crime under Sections 13B, 13B1/2, 13B ¾, 13 F, 13H, 22, 22A,
22B, 22C, 23A, 23B of chapter 265 or sections 2, 3 of chapter 272, against whom a charge under
such statutes has been continued without a finding, or who after a hearing is found by clear and
convincing evidence to have committed a crime as defined in said chapters, and is seeking to
obtain custody or visitation rights with a child who was conceived during the commission of that
rape. For purposes of this section, the failure to seek or obtain a conviction of the above-
enumerated crimes shall not in and of itself constitute proof that such a crime did not occur.
Provided, however, such custody or visitation rights may be granted if and only if such custody
or visitation is found to be in the best interests of the child and the mother of the child
affirmatively consents to such custody or visitation. Termination of these rights shall not prevent
a court from ordering the perpetrator of the crime to pay child support nor shall it limit the right
of the child to inherit through or from the perpetrator of the crime.
Further, no court shall make an order providing custody or visitation rights to a parent
who was convicted of a crime under Sections 13 A and 15D, against whom a charge under such
statutes has been continued without a finding, or who after a hearing is found by clear and
convincing evidence to have committed a crime as defined in said chapters, and is seeking to
obtain custody or visitation right with a child where the victim of the crime was pregnant at the
of 6

time of the crime or becomes pregnant as a result of the crime: or where the victim and the
defendant have a child in common: or where a child is the victim or witness to the crime. For
purposes of this section, the failure to seek or obtain a conviction of the above-enumerated
crimes shall not in and of itself constitute proof that such a crime did not occur. Provided,
however, such custody or rights may be granted if and only if such custody or visitation is found
to be in the best interests of the child and the mother of the child affirmatively consents to such
custody or visitation. Termination of these rights shall not prevent a court from ordering the
perpetrator of the crime to pay child support nor shall it limit the right of the child to inherit
through or from the perpetrator of the crime."
SECTION 4. Chapter 210, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by striking in section 3 the subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof:-
"(d) In consideration of a petition to dispense with parental rights to consent to an
adoption if that person was convicted of a crime under Sections 13B, 13B1/2, 13B ¾, 13 F, 13H,
22, 22A, 22B, 22C, 23A, 23B of chapter 265 or sections 2, 3 of chapter 272, against whom a
charge under such statutes has been continued without a finding, or who after a hearing is found
by clear and convincing evidence to have committed a crime as defined in said chapters, then
there shall be an irrebuttable presumption that said parent is unfit and that it is in the best
interests of the child to dispense with the need for consent to adoption by the parent who
committed such offense or conduct. For purposes of this section, the failure to seek or obtain a
conviction of the above-enumerated crimes shall not in and of itself constitute proof that such a
crime did not occur. Provided, however, a termination petition may be denied if and only if there
has been no conviction of the above-enumerated crimes, such action is found to be contrary to
the best interests of the child and the mother of the child opposes such termination.
of 6

100 (e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the petitioner and a birth parent
101 from entering into an agreement for post-termination contact or communication. The court
102 issuing the termination decree under this section shall have jurisdiction to resolve matters
103 concerning the agreement. Such agreement shall become null and void upon the entry of an
104 adoption or guardianship decree.
105 Notwithstanding the existence of any agreement for post-termination or post-adoption
106 contact or communication, the decree entered under this section shall be final.
107 Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a birth parent who has entered into a
108 post-termination agreement from entering into an agreement for post-adoption contact or
109 communication pursuant to section 6C once an adoptive family has been identified."
of 6